Idaho statutes. Title 63 REVENUE AND TAXATION
Chapter 30 INCOME TAX
§ 63-3038. Administration.

It shall be the duty of the state tax commission of the state of Idaho as established in chapter 1 of title 63, Idaho Code, to administer and enforce the provision of this title. The state tax commission is authorized to designate deputies and employees to specifically administer the provisions of this title and such deputies and employees may be authorized to act in the name of the state tax commission and in its place and stead, provided, however, that such designation shall be made in writing.

§ 63-3039. Rules and regulations — Publication of statistics and law.

The state tax commission shall prescribe all needful rules and regulations for the enforcement of this act, which shall be deemed to include all interpretations and constructions of this act, which must be uniformly made by the state tax commission, and shall prepare all forms which may be required of taxpayers. All rules or regulations and forms shall be printed for general distribution and the state tax commission is hereby authorized to contract for such printing. The state tax commission may make a charge for each copy of rules and regulations, which charge shall not exceed the actual cost of printing the same plus the actual expense of the state tax commission for postage or other handling costs but no charge shall be made for any form required of taxpayers. No rule or regulation shall become effective until thirty (30) days after the rule or regulation as published is made available to the public and each rule or regulation requiring compliance by a taxpayer shall have an effective date. The state tax commission is authorized to establish an annual charge for all rules, regulations and other publications of the commission and to receive subscriptions therefor which shall entitle the subscriber to delivery of such publications by mail as soon as the same are published.

The state tax commission shall as soon as practicable after the effective date of this act adopt rules and regulations as provided herein. Such rules and regulations shall conform wherever practicable to the regulations promulgated by the commissioner for the Internal Revenue Code.

Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, the state tax commission shall prepare and publish annually such statistics as are reasonably available with respect to the operation of the commission including pertinent statistics of the income reported, taxes collected, and such other matters as may be deemed valuable information for the public and also such information and statistics as the governor and/or the legislature may require from time to time.

The state tax commission shall cause this act to be published in pamphlet form together with such amendments as may from time to time be made, which pamphlet shall include any rules or regulations then in effect and shall provide for the sale of the same to the public at a uniform price not to exceed the cost of printing plus the actual cost for postage and other handling charges incurred by the state tax commission.

The publication and printing requirements set forth in this section for the act, amendments to the act, and rules or regulations are satisfied if the information is made available to the public in electronic form.

§ 63-3039A. Rules and regulations

Publication of statistics and law. [Repealed.]

§ 63-3040. Examination of return and determination of tax.

As soon as practicable after the return is filed, the state tax commission shall examine it and shall determine the correct amount of the tax.

§ 63-3041. Overpayments.

If the taxpayer has paid more than the amount determined to be the correct amount of the tax, the excess shall be credited or refunded as provided in section 63-3072, Idaho Code, as amended. In the event a joint return has been filed and one (1) spouse dies prior to issuance of credit or refund, the credit or refund may be granted the surviving spouse. In the event a joint return has been filed by a couple separated after filing of the return, the credit or refund may be equally divided between such persons unless a joint claim has theretofore been properly executed.

§ 63-3042. Examination of books and witnesses. — For the purpose of ascertaining the correctness of any return, making a return where none has been made, determining the liability of any person for any tax payable under this act or the liability at law or in equity of any person in respect to any tax provided in this act or collecting any such liability, the state tax commission or its duly authorized deputy is authorized

To examine any books, papers, records, or other data which may be relevant or material to such inquiry;

To summon the person liable for tax or required to perform the act, or any officer or employee of such person, or any person having possession, custody or care of books of account containing entries relating to the business of the person liable for tax or required to perform the act, or any other person the commission or its deputy may deem proper, to appear before the commission or its delegate at a time and place named in the summons and to produce such books, papers, records or other data and/or give such testimony, under oath, as may be relevant or material to such inquiry; and taxpayers whose pertinent records are kept outside of the state must bring such records to Idaho for examination by the state tax commission upon request by it or a deputy, or, by agreement with the state tax commission, permit an auditor designated by the state tax commission to visit the place where the records are kept and there audit such records; and

To take such testimony of the person concerned or summoned, under oath, as may be relevant or material to such inquiry.

A summons issued under the provisions of this section may be served by the state tax commission or its deputy or by any other person authorized to serve process under the laws of this state by a copy delivered in and to a person to whom it is directed; and the certificate of service signed by the person serving the summons shall be evidence of the facts it states on the hearing of an application for the enforcement of the summons. When the summons requires the production of books, papers, records, or other data, it shall be sufficient if such books, papers, records, or other data are described with reasonable certainty.

The time and place of examination pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be such time and place as may be fixed by the state tax commission or its deputy and as are reasonable under the circumstances, provided that in the case of a summons the date fixed for appearance before the state tax commission or its deputy shall not be less than twenty (20) days from the time of service of the summons.

No taxpayer shall be subjected to unreasonable or unnecessary examinations or investigations.

§ 63-3043. Contempt.

In case any person refuses to comply with any subpoena or order under this act or to produce or permit the examination or inspection of any books, papers or documents pertinent to any investigation or inquiry hereunder, or to testify to any matter regarding which he may lawfully be interrogated, such fact shall be reported by the state tax commission or a deputy commissioner, to the district court or the judge thereof of any district wherein such person resides or may be found, and such court or judge shall order such witness to attend and testify, or otherwise compel obedience to the lawful demands and requests of any of said officials; and on failure or refusal of any person to obey such order, he shall be dealt with as for contempt of court under the applicable provisions of chapter 6 of title 7, Idaho Code.

§ 63-3044. Deficiency in tax.

As used in this act in respect of a tax imposed by this act the term “deficiency” means:

The amount by which the tax imposed by this act exceeds the amount shown as the tax by the taxpayer upon his return; but the amount so shown on the return shall first be increased by the amounts previously assessed (or collected without assessment) as a deficiency, and decreased by the amounts previously abated, credited, refunded, or otherwise repaid in respect of such tax; or,

If no amount is shown as the tax by the taxpayer upon his return, or if no return is made by the taxpayer, then the amount by which the tax exceeds the amounts previously assessed (or collected without assessment) as a deficiency; but such amounts previously assessed, or collected without assessment, shall first be decreased by the amounts previously abated, credited, refunded, or otherwise repaid in respect of such tax; or,

Any amount of tax which is due and unpaid.

§ 63-3045. Notice of redetermination or deficiency — Interest.

If, in the case of any taxpayer, the state tax commission determines that there is a deficiency in respect of the tax imposed by this title, the state tax commission shall, immediately upon discovery thereof, send notice of such deficiency to the taxpayer by first class mail or by other commercial delivery service providing proof of delivery, whichever is the most cost efficient. The notice shall be sent to the taxpayer’s last address known to the state tax commission. The notice of deficiency shall be accompanied by an explanation of the specific reason for the determination and an explanation of the taxpayer’s right to appeal. Within sixty-three (63) days after such notice is mailed, the taxpayer may, at his option, file a protest in writing with the state tax commission and obtain redetermination of the deficiency.
(1)(a) If, in the case of any taxpayer, the state tax commission determines that there is a deficiency in respect of the tax imposed by this title, the state tax commission shall, immediately upon discovery thereof, send notice of such deficiency to the taxpayer by first class mail or by other commercial delivery service providing proof of delivery, whichever is the most cost efficient. The notice shall be sent to the taxpayer’s last address known to the state tax commission. The notice of deficiency shall be accompanied by an explanation of the specific reason for the determination and an explanation of the taxpayer’s right to appeal. Within sixty-three (63) days after such notice is mailed, the taxpayer may, at his option, file a protest in writing with the state tax commission and obtain redetermination of the deficiency.

If the taxpayer files a protest with the state tax commission within the period set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection, and such protest does not comply with the rules of the state tax commission and is therefore inadequate to perfect the taxpayer’s right to a redetermination of the deficiency determination, then the state tax commission shall notify the taxpayer, in the same manner as set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection, of such inadequacies, setting forth in said notice the corrective action to be taken by the taxpayer to perfect his protest. The taxpayer shall thereafter have twenty-eight (28) days from the date of said notice to perfect his protest.

No assessment of a deficiency in respect to the tax imposed by this chapter, and no distraint or proceedings in court for its collection, shall be made, begun, or prosecuted until such notice has been mailed to the taxpayer, nor until all appeal rights relating to the deficiency have become final.

Following a perfected protest, the taxpayer has the right to an independent administrative redetermination of the originating division’s determination before the state tax commission, including a hearing. The purpose of the hearing is to discuss the deficiency determination and the taxpayer’s protest with a commissioner or duly authorized representative of the commission. The meeting shall be held informally and evidence shall be freely admitted regardless of the rules of evidence.
(2)(a) Following a perfected protest, the taxpayer has the right to an independent administrative redetermination of the originating division’s determination before the state tax commission, including a hearing. The purpose of the hearing is to discuss the deficiency determination and the taxpayer’s protest with a commissioner or duly authorized representative of the commission. The meeting shall be held informally and evidence shall be freely admitted regardless of the rules of evidence.

Tax commission staff assigned to the administrative redetermination may not engage in communications relating to the taxpayer’s protest with employees of the originating division without first providing the taxpayer the opportunity to participate, except for questions that involve ministerial, administrative or procedural matters that do not address the substance of the issues or positions taken in the case or as otherwise allowed under title 63, Idaho Code, and the rules promulgated thereunder. The state tax commission shall promulgate rules governing communications with the originating division to ensure an independent review process. The provisions of this subsection do not create a substantive right affecting the taxpayer’s tax liability or the state tax commission’s ability to determine, assess or collect that tax liability, including statutory interest and any penalties, if applicable.

Any hearing conducted under the provisions of this section may be conducted, in whole or in part, by telephone, television, or other electronic means if each participant in the hearing has an opportunity to participate in the entire proceeding while it is taking place.

A taxpayer has the right to be represented by, or be accompanied by, any person of his choice in any proceeding before the tax commission. If the taxpayer is not present at a proceeding, the representative of that taxpayer must be designated in writing by the taxpayer as shall be prescribed in administrative rules or in any manner acceptable to the tax commission.
(5) Following a perfected protest, the taxpayer may submit additional evidence or documentation during the redetermination process subject to the provisions of section 63-3045B(3)(a), Idaho Code.

(6) If the taxpayer does not file a protest with the state tax commission within the time prescribed in subsection (1)(a) of this section, the deficiency shall be assessed and shall become due and payable upon notice and demand from the state tax commission.

(7)(a) Interest shall apply to deficiencies in tax and refunds of tax. Interest shall not apply to any penalty or to unpaid accrued interest. Interest relating to deficiencies or refunds accruing after the original due date of the return, but not including extensions of the due date, shall be computed on the net of any underpayments and overpayments of a tax liability required to be shown as due on the same return.

(b) Interest upon any deficiency shall be assessed at the same time as the deficiency, shall be due and payable upon notice and demand from the state tax commission and shall be collected as a part of the tax at the rate per annum determined under the provisions of paragraph (c) of this subsection from the date prescribed for the payment of the tax. In the event any of the deficiency is reduced by reason of a carryback of a net operating loss or a capital loss carryback, such reduction in deficiency shall not affect the computation of interest under this subsection for the period ending with the last day of the taxable year in which the net operating loss or capital loss arises.

(c) The rate of interest accruing during any calendar year, or portion thereof, upon any deficiency, or payable upon an overpayment or refund, shall be two percent (2%) plus the rate determined under section 1274(d), Internal Revenue Code, by the secretary of the treasury of the United States as the midterm federal rate as it applies on September 15 of the immediately preceding calendar year rounded to the nearest whole number.

(8) When the time provisions contained in this section conflict with the provisions of section 63-4208, Idaho Code, relating to the assessment of taxes on illegal possession of controlled substances, the provisions of section 63-4208, Idaho Code, shall prevail.

Section Mandatory.

This section is not discretionary, but rather, is mandatory, and both the Supreme Court and the district court lacked any power to remit the interest that is mandated by the statute. Union Pac. R.R. v. State Tax Comm’n, 105 Idaho 471, 670 P.2d 878 (1983).

§ 63-3045A. Assessment of tax.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no tax commission activities to enforce collection of tax may be conducted, nor may a proceeding to collect a tax be instituted, until taxes are assessed in accordance with the provisions of this section.

Taxes and related interest, including revisions for mathematical errors, are assessed immediately upon receipt of a tax return, amended return or other consent signed by the taxpayer or the taxpayer’s authorized representative showing the taxes due. The tax commission may presume that the signature is the signature of the taxpayer or the taxpayer’s authorized representative until the contrary is established by a preponderance of the evidence.

In the event that the amount of tax is understated on the taxpayer’s return due to a mathematical error, the state tax commission shall notify the taxpayer that an amount of tax in excess of that shown on the return is due and has been asserted. Such a notice of additional tax due shall not be considered a notice of a deficiency nor shall the taxpayer have any right of protest or appeal as in the case of a deficiency based on such notice, and the assessment and collection of the amount of tax erroneously omitted in the return is not prohibited by any provision of this chapter.

Any amount paid as a tax or in respect of a tax, other than amounts withheld at the source or paid as estimated income tax, shall be deemed to be assessed upon the date of receipt of payment, notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter.

For all other purposes of this chapter, a tax is deemed assessed when:

A taxpayer fails to file a protest with the state tax commission within the time prescribed in section 63-3045, Idaho Code, or an action in district court or the board of tax appeals within the time prescribed in subsection (a) of section 63-3049, Idaho Code; or

Upon conclusion of any such proceeding for any amount upheld at that conclusion of such proceeding.

An assessment is not required before the tax commission may conduct audits and investigations or make inquiries of taxpayers or other persons relating to matters within the tax commission’s jurisdiction. The making of an assessment is not required before the tax commission may file a judicial action under section 63-3030A or 63-3064, Idaho Code, or actions for injunctive or declaratory relief.

When taxes and related interest have been assessed, the state tax commission shall create a record of assessment by recording the liability of the taxpayer along with an identification of the taxpayer, the character of the liability assessed, the taxable period, if applicable, and the amount of the assessment. The record of an assessment shall be kept and maintained in a record in the office of the state tax commission in accordance with rules prescribed by the state tax commission. Upon request of the taxpayer, the state tax commission shall furnish the taxpayer a copy of the record of assessment.

Penalties and additions to tax in the case of a deficiency shall be assessed in the same manner as the taxes and related interest.

§ 63-3045B. Final decisions of the commission.

If a taxpayer does not file a protest within the sixty-three (63) day period allowed, the notice of deficiency of the tax commission becomes final on the day following the end of the protest period.

If a taxpayer files a protest, but does not perfect the protest, the notice of deficiency of the tax commission becomes final on the twenty-ninth day following the date the tax commission notified the taxpayer that the protest was not perfected, except that the tax commission may reduce the amount of the deficiency during the twenty-nine (29) day period.

When a perfected protest has been filed, the state tax commission shall, within fourteen (14) days thereof, provide the taxpayer with a written acknowledgment of the protest. After the acknowledgment, a final decision of the tax commission must be rendered within one hundred eighty (180) days from either:

A request in writing, in a form prescribed by rules of the tax commission, from the taxpayer for a final decision on that issue; if the taxpayer requests such a decision, the tax commission may refuse to accept additional evidence or documentation or refuse to allow an appearance at any proceeding with the commission or any representative of the commission during such one hundred eighty (180) day period; or

The conclusion of any hearing pursuant to section 63-3045(2)(a), Idaho Code, and the taxpayer has not requested or received any extension of time to present additional evidence or testimony.

A final decision may be held in abeyance, notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (3) of this section, with the prior approval in writing of the taxpayer.

If a final decision of the tax commission is not rendered or the protest is not resolved by compromise, consent or withdrawal of the notice of deficiency determination within the time limits established by subsection (3) of this section, the notice of deficiency shall be null and void ab initio, with prejudice.

A final decision of the tax commission shall be issued in writing and mailed or served upon the taxpayer within the time limits set forth herein. The final written decision of the tax commission shall, one hundred twenty (120) days after the date of the final written decision, be available for public inspection and copying pursuant to the provisions of section 74-102, Idaho Code, except:

The taxpayer’s name, address, taxpayer identification number, social security number, permit number, or other identifying information shall be removed from the final written decision of the tax commission that is made available to the public; and

Any proprietary or other identifying information contained in the written decision that the taxpayer requests be excised shall be excised by the tax commission in the final written decision made available to the public. The taxpayer must make such request in writing before ninety-one (91) days have elapsed after the date of the final decision.

§ 63-3046. Penalties and additions to the tax in case of deficiency.

If any part of any deficiency is due to negligence or disregard of rules but without intent to defraud, five percent (5%) of the total amount of the deficiency (in addition to such deficiency) shall be assessed, collected and paid in the same manner as if it were a deficiency.

If any part of any deficiency is due to fraud with intent to evade tax, then fifty percent (50%) of the total amount of the deficiency (in addition to such deficiency) shall be so assessed, collected and paid.

In the event the return required by this chapter is not filed on or before the due date (including extensions) of the return, there may be collected a penalty of five percent (5%) of the tax due on such returns for each month elapsing after the due date (including extensions) of such returns until the return is filed.
(c)(1) In the event the return required by this chapter is not filed on or before the due date (including extensions) of the return, there may be collected a penalty of five percent (5%) of the tax due on such returns for each month elapsing after the due date (including extensions) of such returns until the return is filed.

In the event the return required by this chapter is filed but the tax shown thereon to be due is not paid, there may be collected a penalty of one-half percent (0.5%) of the tax due on such return for each month elapsing after the later of the due date of such return or the date the return was filed until the tax is paid.

If there is a substantial understatement of tax for any taxable year, there shall be added to the tax an amount equal to ten percent (10%) of the amount of any underpayment attributable to such understatement.
(d)(1) If there is a substantial understatement of tax for any taxable year, there shall be added to the tax an amount equal to ten percent (10%) of the amount of any underpayment attributable to such understatement.

For purposes of this subsection, there is a substantial understatement of tax for any taxable year if the amount of the understatement for the taxable year exceeds the greater of:

Ten percent (10%) of the tax required to be shown on the return for the taxable year, or

Five thousand dollars ($5,000).

In the case of a corporation, paragraph (d)(2)(ii) of this section shall be applied by substituting ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for five thousand dollars ($5,000).

For purposes of paragraph (d)(2) of this section, the term “understatement” means the excess of:

The amount of tax required to be shown on the return for the taxable year, over

The amount of the tax imposed which is shown on the return.

The amount of the understatement under paragraph (4) shall be reduced by that portion of the understatement which is attributable to:

The tax treatment of any item by the taxpayer if there is or was substantial authority for such treatment, or

Any item with respect to which the relevant facts affecting the item’s tax treatment are adequately disclosed in the return or in a statement attached to the return.

In the case of any item attributable to a tax shelter as defined in section 6661 of the Internal Revenue Code:

Paragraph (5)(ii) shall not apply, and

Paragraph (5)(i) shall not apply unless (in addition to meeting the requirements of such paragraph) the taxpayer reasonably believed that the tax treatment of such item by the taxpayer was more likely than not the proper treatment.
(7) The state tax commission may waive all or any part of the addition to tax provided by this section on a showing by the taxpayer that there was reasonable cause for the understatement (or part thereof) and that the taxpayer acted in good faith.

Any person who fails to file a statement of payment to another person required by this chapter, including the duplicate statement of tax withheld on wages, on the date prescribed therefor (including any extension of time for filing) shall, be subject to a penalty of two dollars ($2.00) for each month or part of a month each statement is not so filed, but the total amount imposed on the delinquent person for all such failures during any calendar year shall not exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000).
(e)(1) Any person who fails to file a statement of payment to another person required by this chapter, including the duplicate statement of tax withheld on wages, on the date prescribed therefor (including any extension of time for filing) shall, be subject to a penalty of two dollars ($2.00) for each month or part of a month each statement is not so filed, but the total amount imposed on the delinquent person for all such failures during any calendar year shall not exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000).

Any employer required to register under the provisions of section 63-3035, Idaho Code, who fails to register after receiving written notice from the state tax commission of the requirement to register shall be subject to a penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) for each month or part of a month after the date of the notice during which the failure occurs.

The penalties provided in this subsection shall not apply if the person shows that the failure to register is due to reasonable cause and not to willful neglect.

If the penalty to be added to the tax by subsection (a), (b), (c)(1), (d) or (e) of this section or by section 63-3033, Idaho Code, is less than ten dollars ($10.00), the penalty to be added to the tax shall be a minimum of ten dollars ($10.00).

Total penalties imposed under subsections (a), (c) and (d) of this section and under section 63-3033, Idaho Code, shall not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the tax due on the return.

A processing charge to be determined and established annually by the state tax commission shall be collected from any person who draws or delivers a check, draft or order for the payment of money in complete or partial satisfaction of the tax imposed by this chapter if that person does not have sufficient funds in or credit with the bank or depository upon which the check, draft or order is drawn. Money collected under this subsection shall be paid to the state tax commission to defer costs of handling such checks, drafts or orders.

§ 63-3046A. Interest on underpayment of estimated tax.

In the event that a person required to pay estimated taxes under section 63-3036A, Idaho Code, fails to pay such estimated taxes or fails to pay the full amount of estimated taxes due, the state tax commission shall assess interest on such unpaid or underpaid estimated taxes at the rate of interest set in section 63-3045, Idaho Code, as the interest to be assessed on a deficiency in taxes.

Interest shall be computed on the difference between the amount of estimated payment required to be made on each quarterly report and the amount of quarterly payment actually made. Interest shall apply from the due date of the quarterly report until the required amount is paid, or until, excluding extensions, the due date of the return, whichever is first.

§ 63-3046B. Failure to file partnership return.

Penalty. In addition to the penalty imposed by section 63-3075, Idaho Code, if any partnership required to file a return under section 63-3030, Idaho Code, for any taxable year:

Fails to file such return at the time prescribed therefor by section 63-3030, Idaho Code, (determined with regard to any extension of time for filing); or

Files a return which fails to show the information required under section 63-3030, Idaho Code, such partnership shall be liable for a penalty determined under subsection (b) of this section for each month (or fraction thereof) during which such failure continues (but not to exceed five (5) months), unless it is shown that such failure is due to reasonable cause.

Amount per month. For purposes of subsection (a) of this section, the amount determined under this subsection for any month is the product of:

Ten dollars ($10.00), multiplied by

the number of persons who are partners in the partnership during any part of the taxable year, except that in the case of partnerships with no business activity in Idaho during the taxable year but with partners who are Idaho residents, multiply the amount in subsection (b)(1) of this section by the number of partners who are either Idaho residents or are persons other than individuals who are transacting business in Idaho.

Assessment of penalty. The penalty imposed in subsection (a) of this section shall be assessed against the partnership.

§ 63-3047. Compromised cases.

The state tax commission or its delegate may compromise any taxes, penalties or interest arising under the provisions of this chapter instead of commencing suit thereon and may settle any such case with the consent of the attorney general after suit thereon has been commenced.

§ 63-3048. Adjusted or compromised cases — Settlement and closing agreements.

The state tax commission or its delegate is authorized to enter into an agreement in writing with any person relating to the liability of such person, or of the person for whom he is acting, in respect of any tax under this chapter for any taxable period ending prior to the date of the agreement.

Where the amount in issue relating to the tax liability of any taxpayer is equal to or exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) and the commission has delegated the authority to enter into a settlement or closing agreement for such liability to an individual commissioner, the following minimum standards of procedure shall apply:

In addition to the individual commissioner delegated the principal responsibility to negotiate on behalf of the commission, a second commissioner shall be present for a final review of the negotiated settlement or closing agreement. Both commissioners shall be required to sign the settlement or closing agreement to make it binding and complete.

In addition to the two (2) commissioners present at the final review, a representative of the office of the attorney general shall be present as well as tax commission staff, which shall include a tax policy specialist and either a representative from the audit division or other division where the case originated.

The tax policy specialist or deputy attorney general assigned to a settlement or closing agreement shall prepare and submit to the commission a written summary for the final review explaining the terms of the settlement or closing agreement. The summary shall include any recommendations of agency staff including audit staff.

The tax commission shall retain a copy of all settlement and closing agreements and, in addition, all summaries prepared pursuant to subsection (b)(3) of this section.

The tax commission shall submit an annual report to the governor and the legislature by March 1 of each year summarizing all settlement and closing agreements entered into during the previous calendar year as defined by subsection (b) of this section.

The tax commission shall promulgate administrative rules in compliance with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, to implement the provisions of this section.

Such agreement shall be final and conclusive and, except upon a showing of fraud or malfeasance, or misrepresentation of a material fact:

The case shall not be reopened as to matters agreed upon or the agreement modified by any officer, employee, or agent of the state.

In any suit, action, or proceeding, such agreement, or any determination, assessment, collection, payment abatement, refund, or credit made in accordance therewith, shall not be annulled, modified, set aside, or disregarded.

§ 63-3049. Judicial review.

Redetermination by the state tax commission may be reviewed in the district court for Ada county or the county in which the taxpayer resides or has his principal office or place of business by a complaint filed by the taxpayer against the state tax commission within ninety-one (91) days after the receipt of notice of the decision of the state tax commission denying, in whole or in part, any protest of the taxpayer or, within the same period, by filing an appeal with the board of tax appeals. Upon the serving of summons upon the state tax commission the case shall proceed as other civil cases but may be heard by the judge in chambers. If the case is appealed to the board of tax appeals, the hearing before that body shall proceed as set forth in the act creating such board. If the court finds that any tax is due, it shall enter judgment for such tax, including any interest or penalties that may also be due and owing, against the taxpayer. Any taxes, penalties or interest paid, found by the court to be in excess of that which can be legally assessed, shall be ordered refunded to the taxpayer with interest from the time of payment. In the case of sales or use tax and corporate income tax decisions by the state tax commission, when the amount asserted exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), no appeal to the board of tax appeals shall be allowed.

Before a taxpayer may seek review by the district court or the board of tax appeals, the taxpayer shall secure the payment of the tax or deficiency as assessed by depositing cash with the tax commission in an amount equal to twenty percent (20%) of the amount asserted. In lieu of the cash deposit, the taxpayer may deposit any other type of security acceptable to the tax commission.

Any party to the proceedings may appeal to the supreme court from the judgment of the district court under the rules and regulations prescribed for appeals. If the appeal be taken by the state tax commission, it shall not be required to give any undertaking or to make any deposits to secure the cost of such appeal or to secure the payment of any amounts ordered refunded by the court.

Whenever it appears to the court that:

Proceedings before it have been instituted or maintained by a party primarily for delay; or

A party’s position in such proceeding is frivolous or groundless; or

A party unreasonably failed to pursue available administrative remedies;

No act, order or proceeding of the tax commission shall be valid until after the time allowed for taking such court action has expired or such court action is finally determined. As used in this section, the term “amount asserted” shall mean the total amount due, as set forth in the decision of the state tax commission.

§ 63-3050. Action to collect unpaid tax or deficiency.

Any tax owed the state tax commission, any interest, penalty, additional amount, or addition to such tax, and any tax or any interest, penalty, additional amount, or addition to such tax which has been erroneously refunded and any deficiency shall constitute a debt to the state of Idaho and may be collected by lien foreclosure or sued for and recovered in any proper form of action, in the name of the state of Idaho, in any court having jurisdiction over the taxpayer or property owned by or in which the taxpayer has an interest. The remedy herein shall be in addition to any and all other existing remedies.

§ 63-3050A. Relief from joint and several liability on joint return.

An individual who has filed a joint return and who has been granted relief from joint and several liability by the internal revenue service shall have such relief recognized, granted and honored by the state tax commission for state income tax purposes.

The state tax commission shall promulgate such rules as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

§ 63-3051. Property subject to lien.

If any person liable to pay any tax neglects or refuses to pay the same after demand, the amount of such tax, including any interest, penalty, additional amount, or addition to such tax, together with any costs that may accrue in addition thereto, shall be a lien in favor of the state of Idaho upon all property and rights to property, whether real or personal, belonging to such person or acquired afterwards and before the lien expires. Such lien shall not be valid as against any mortgagee or other lienholder, pledgee, secured party, purchaser, or judgment lienor until notice thereof has been filed in the office of the secretary of state in the form and manner provided in chapter 19, title 45, Idaho Code.

§ 63-3052. Income tax lien. [Repealed.]

§ 63-3053. Filing and indexing liens. [Repealed.]

§ 63-3054. Discharge of lien. [Repealed.]